California, session 20252026, AB2579.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5850 of the Civil Code is amended to read:5850. (a) If an association adopts or has adopted a policy imposing any monetary penalty, including any fee, on any association member for a violation of the governing documents, including any monetary penalty relating to the activities of a guest or tenant of the member, the board shall adopt and distribute to each member, in the annual policy statement prepared pursuant to Section 5310, a schedule of the monetary penalties that may be assessed for those violations, which shall be in accordance with authorization for member discipline contained in the governing documents. Monetary penalties shall be reasonable.(b) Any new or revised monetary penalty that is adopted after complying with subdivision (a) may be included in a supplement that is delivered to the members individually, pursuant to Section 4040.(c) A monetary penalty for a violation of the governing documents shall not exceed the lesser of the following:(1) The monetary penalty stated in the schedule of monetary penalties or supplement that is in effect at the time of the violation.(2) One hundred dollars ($100) per violation.(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the board may impose a penalty stated in the schedule of monetary penalties or supplement that is in effect at the time of the violation that is greater than one hundred dollars ($100) per violation, if the violation may result in any of the following: either of the following apply to the violation:(1)Any of the following fire or environmental hazards:(A)The storage of any flammable or combustible material in a common area.(B)The obstruction of a fire lane.(C)The tampering or otherwise disabling of a fire alarm, smoke detector, fire extinguisher, or fire sprinkler.(D)Smoking in any location within the community.(E)The use of open flames in any area in which the use of open flames is prohibited.(F)The improper discharge of chemicals or hazardous waste in the community.(G)The failure to abide by any fire hardening and setback requirements.(H)The flying of drones over common areas or another person’s lot or condominium.(2)Any of the following issues with respect to architectural improvements:(A)The unauthorized construction of improvements or alterations, or the creation of unstable structures.(B)The exposure or installation of wiring or electrical components that is not in compliance with any applicable code requirements.(C)The removal of any safety features, including the removal of railings or barriers from decks.(3)Any of the following issues with respect to animals:(A)The keeping of a pet in the community that poses a danger to persons, other pets, or property.(B)The keeping of a pet in the community that is determined by a public animal control agency to be vicious or potentially dangerous.(C)The failure to keep any pet under control.(D)The failure to pick up or properly dispose of pet waste in the common area or on another owner’s lot.(E)The keeping of prohibited animals within the community.(4)Any of the following with respect to maintenance:(A)The stockpiling or excessive storage of items visible from the common area or outside the lot or condominium that poses fire or health risks.(B)The accumulation of trash or debris, which results in a sanitation risk and attracts rodents or other pests.(C)The visible growth of mold or mildew on exterior walls or roofs, which could impact neighboring lots or condominiums.(D)The accumulation of standing water to remain or pool, which poses risks of reproduction among mosquitoes or other pests.(5)Any of the following damages with respect to common areas:(A)The cutting down, removal, or modification of trees, plants, or other landscaping or vegetation in a common area.(B)The riding of bicycles, e-bikes, or other related motorized vehicles in a dangerous and unsafe manner, or otherwise in violation of the governing documents, in a common area.(C)The dumping or otherwise discharging of water or other fluids onto a common area, resulting in obstructions in the community.(D)The placement of personal items within a common area, including, but not limited to, on walkways, sidewalks, trails, or emergency exit paths.(E)The placement of toys, games, or sports equipment in a common area or on another owner’s property when not in use, resulting in tripping hazards or the obstruction of traffic. (F)The obstruction of tree limbs or overgrown landscaping into the sidewalks and streets of a common area.(6)Either of the following violent acts:(A)Any physical acts or threats by residents or guests, including, but not limited to, harassment or stalking by residents, members, or association employees or vendors.(B)The discharging of a weapon.(7)A violation of a short-term rental policy that is for a period of 30 days or less.(A) The violation may result in an adverse health or safety impact on the common area or another association member’s property.(B) The violation is contained in the list developed and published by the Department of Real Estate pursuant to Section 5851.(2) Before imposing a penalty on a violation pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), the board shall make a written finding specifying the adverse health or safety impact in a board meeting open to the members.(e) A late charge or interest shall not be charged to a member for a monetary penalty.(f) An association shall provide a copy of the most recently distributed schedule of monetary penalties, along with any applicable supplements to that schedule, to any member upon request.SEC. 2. Section 5851 is added to the Civil Code, to read:5851. (a) On or before January 1, 2028, the Department of Real Estate shall develop and publish a list of specified violations for which an association may impose a monetary penalty that is greater than one hundred dollars ($100), notwithstanding any other provision of law.(b) (1) The list shall be limited to violations that are clearly defined and address significant risks to health, safety, or the integrity of the common interest development.(2) (A) In developing the list, the department shall identify categories of violations that pose heightened risks to health, safety, or the integrity of the common interest development, including, but not limited to, violations that do any of the following:(i) Create a risk of fire or other life safety hazards.(ii) Result in environmental hazards.(iii) Involve unpermitted construction or alterations.(iv) Relate to animal control and pose a risk to other residents.(v) Constitute a failure to maintain property in a manner that creates health or safety risks.(vi) Involve violence or threats of violence.(vii) Cause damage to the common area or common facilities.(B) The department shall ensure that each category of violation included in the list is described using clear and objective standards sufficient to provide notice to members of the conduct subject to enhanced penalties.(c) Before finalizing the list, the department shall conduct a stakeholder engagement process to solicit input from a broad range of interested parties. The department, at a minimum, shall convene a stakeholder group that includes all of the following members:(1) Members of common interest developments representing diverse geographic regions of the state.(2) Members of age-restricted communities.(3) Members of associations on fixed incomes.(4) Association board members.(5) Association management professionals.(d) The department shall release a draft list of violations for public comment and shall consider all timely submitted comments before finalizing the list of violations.(e) The department shall publish the final list of violations on the department’s internet website.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 5855 of the Civil Code is amended to read:5855. (a) When the board is to meet to consider or impose discipline upon a member, or to impose a monetary charge as a means of reimbursing the association for costs incurred by the association in the repair of damage to the common area and facilities caused by a member or the member’s guest or tenant, the board shall notify the member in writing, by either personal delivery or individual delivery pursuant to Section 4040, at least 10 days prior to the meeting.(b) The notification shall contain, at a minimum, the date, time, and place of the meeting, the nature of the alleged violation for which a member may be disciplined or the nature of the damage to the common area and facilities for which a monetary charge may be imposed, and a statement that the member has a right to attend and may address the board at the meeting. The board shall meet in executive session if requested by the member.(c) (1) A member shall have the opportunity to cure the violation prior to the meeting. The board shall not impose discipline in either of the following circumstances:(A) The member cures the violation prior to the meeting.(B) If curing the violation would take longer than the time between the notice provided pursuant to subdivision (a) and the meeting, the member provides financial commitment to cure the violation.(2) A member engaged in habitual, repeated, or continuing violations is not deemed to have cured a violation simply because the violation is not occurring at the time of the hearing.(d) If the board and the member are not in agreement after the meeting, a member shall have the opportunity to request internal dispute resolution pursuant to Section 5910.(e) If the board and the member are in agreement after the meeting, the board shall draft a written resolution. The written resolution, signed by the board and the member of the dispute pursuant to procedures not in conflict with the law or governing documents, binds the association and is judicially enforceable.(f) If the board imposes discipline on a member or imposes a monetary charge on the member for damage to the common area and facilities, the board shall provide the member with a written notification of the decision, by either personal delivery or individual delivery pursuant to Section 4040, within 14 days following the action.(g) A disciplinary action or the imposition of a monetary charge for damage to the common area shall not be effective against a member unless the board fulfills the requirements of this section.